Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 1 Professional Counselors, Marital and Family Therapists
63-22-122. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Appraisal activities” means selecting, administering, scoring and interpreting instruments designed to assess an individual's aptitudes, achievements or interests, which are used to understand, measure or facilitate such individual's normal human growth and development, but does not include the use of projective techniques in the assessment of personality, nor the use of psychological or clinical tests designed to identify or classify abnormal or pathological human behavior, nor the use of individually administered intelligence tests. Consistent with each counselor's formal education and training, licensed professional counselors may administer and utilize appropriate assessment instruments that measure and/or diagnose problems and/or dysfunctions within the context of human growth and development as part of the counseling process or in the development of a treatment plan;

“Counseling” means assisting an individual, through the counseling relationship, in a manner intended to facilitate normal human growth and development, using a combination of mental health and human development principles, methods and techniques, to achieve mental, emotional, physical, social, moral, educational, spiritual and/or career development and adjustment throughout the life span;

“Licensed professional counselor” means a person licensed under this part who is professionally trained in counseling and guidance services designed to facilitate normal human growth and development through individual, family or group counseling, educational procedures, assessment, consultation and research and who assists individuals by the practice of counseling with their personal, social, career or educational development as they pass through life stages;

“Practice of counseling” means rendering or offering to render to individuals, groups, organizations or the general public any service involving the application of principles, techniques, methods or procedures of the counseling profession, including appraisal activities, counseling, consulting and referral activities. Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the treatment of any mental, emotional or adjustment disorder other than marital problems, parent-child problems, child and adolescent antisocial behavior, adult antisocial behavior, other specified family circumstances, other interpersonal problems, phase of life problems, other life circumstance problems, occupational problems and uncomplicated bereavement, except as provided in subdivision (5); and

“Practice of counseling as a mental health service provider” means the application of mental health and human development principles in order to:

Facilitate human development and adjustment throughout the life span;

Prevent, diagnose, and treat mental, emotional or behavioral disorders and associated disorders that interfere with mental health;

Conduct assessments and diagnoses for the purpose of establishing treatment goals and objectives within the limitations prescribed in subdivision (1); and

Plan, implement and evaluate treatment plans using counseling treatment interventions. “Counseling treatment interventions” means the application of cognitive, affective, behavioral and systemic counseling strategies that include principles of development, wellness and pathology that reflect a pluralistic society. Nothing in this definition shall be construed to permit the performance of any act that licensed professional counselors designated as mental health service providers are not educated and trained to perform, nor shall it be construed to permit the designation of testing reports as “psychological.”

Acts 1991, ch. 421, § 15; 1995, ch. 318, §§ 5, 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-22-150 was transferred to § 63-22-122 by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.